Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2213
Treasurer; failure to notify holders of registered warrants; penalty.

Any treasurer who shall, for a period of five days after money in amount sufficient to pay any registered warrant in its order has been received, fail to mail notice thereof to the person registering such warrant, shall forfeit to such person ten percent on the amount of such warrant, and ten percent additional for every thirty days thereafter during which such failure shall continue.

Laws 1871, § 11, p. 116;

R.S.1913, § 6652;

C.S.1922, § 6183;

C.S.1929, § 77-2411;

R.S.1943, § 77-2213.